Wisconsin, session 2025, AB317.
do enact as follows:AB317,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB317,28Section 2. 20.437 (2) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB317,2,10920.437 (2) (c) Child care quality improvement program. The amounts in the 10schedule for the program under s. 49.133.AB317,311Section 3. 49.133 of the statutes is created to read:AB317,3,51249.133 Child care quality improvement program. (1) The department 13may establish a program under which it may, from the appropriation under s. 1420.437 (2) (c) and the allocation under s. 49.175 (1) (qm), make monthly payments 1and monthly per-child payments to child care providers certified under s. 48.651, 2child care centers licensed under s. 48.65, and child care programs established or 3contracted for by a school board under s. 120.13 (14). The department may 4investigate and recover from payment recipients under this section amounts 5overpaid or obtained through fraud.AB317,3,96(2) If the department establishes the program under sub. (1), the department 7shall promulgate rules to implement the program, including establishing eligibility 8requirements and payment amounts and setting requirements for how recipients 9may use the payments.AB317,410Section 4. 49.155 (1g) (i) of the statutes is repealed.AB317,511Section 5. 49.155 (6) (e) 2., 3. and 5. of the statutes are repealed.AB317,612Section 6. 49.175 (1) (qm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB317,3,161349.175 (1) (qm) Quality care for quality kids. For the child care quality 14improvement activities specified in ss. 49.133, 49.155 (1g), and 49.257, $16,683,700 15$49,446,300 in each fiscal year 2022-23. In fiscal year 2023-24, for such activities, 16$28,518,700. In fiscal year 2024-25, for such activities, $46,018,700.AB317,910617Section 9106. Nonstatutory provisions; Children and Families.AB317,4,318(1) Child care quality improvement program. Using the procedure under 19s. 227.24, the department of children and families may promulgate the rules 20authorized under s. 49.133 (2) as emergency rules. Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) 21(c) and (2), emergency rules promulgated under this subsection remain in effect 22until July 1, 2027, or the date on which permanent rules take effect, whichever is 23sooner. Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (a), (2) (b), and (3), the department of 24children and families is not required to provide evidence that promulgating a rule 1under this subsection as an emergency rule is necessary for the preservation of the 2public peace, health, safety, or welfare and is not required to provide a finding of 3emergency for a rule promulgated under this paragraph.AB317,4,44